src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
## LEXICON Root  pointing to main parts of speech
- **Nomen ;** 
- **Verbum ;** 
- **oqr ;**  partikler og pronominer
- **ateq ;**  proprier (baade personer og steder)
- **Punctuation ;** 
- **Symbols ;** 
- **numeralier ;** 
- **Forkortelser ;** 
- **Akronymer ;** 
- **Pronomen ;** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/qupaloraarsuk/lang-kal/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
